Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0461.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13m. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7340 CS F Sale, distribution, or delivery of product containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine by mail, internet, or telephone 4 333.7340c(2) CS D Soliciting another person to purchase or obtain ephedrine or pseudoephedrine to manufacture methamphetamine 10 333.7341(8) CS G Delivery or manufacture of imitation controlled substance 2 333.7401(2)(a)(i) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 333.7401(2)(a)(ii) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.7401(2)(a)(iii) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(2)(a)(iv) CS D Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(2)(b)(i) CS B Delivery or manufacture of methamphetamine or 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine 20 333.7401(2)(b)(ii) CS E Delivery or manufacture of certain schedule 1, 2, or 3 controlled substances 7 333.7401(2)(c) CS F Delivery or manufacture of schedule 4 controlled substance 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7401(2)(d)(i) CS C Delivery or manufacture of 45 or more kilograms of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 15 333.7401(2)(d)(ii) CS D Delivery or manufacture of 5 or more but less than 45 kilograms of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 7 333.7401(2)(d)(iii) CS F Delivery or manufacture of less than 5 kilograms or 20 plants of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 4 333.7401(2)(e) CS G Delivery or manufacture of schedule 5 controlled substance 2 333.7401(2)(f) CS D Delivery or manufacture of a prescription form or counterfeit prescription form 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 333.7401(5) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 333.7401(6)(a) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, or certain opiates 40 333.7401(6)(b) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30 333.7401(7)(a) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil 30 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7401(7)(b) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain opiates 20 333.7401(7)(c) CS C Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(8)(a) CS B Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil 25 333.7401(8)(b) CS D Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of certain opiates or certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401a Person B Delivering a controlled substance or GBL with intent to commit criminal sexual conduct 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7401b(3)(a) CS E Delivery or manufacture of GBL 7 333.7401b(3)(b) CS G Possession of GBL 2 333.7401c(2)(a) CS D Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory 10 333.7401c(2)(b) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory in presence of minor 20 333.7401c(2)(c) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving hazardous waste 20 333.7401c(2)(d) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory near certain places 20 333.7401c(2)(e) CS A Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving firearm or other harmful device 25 333.7401c(2)(f) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving methamphetamine 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 333.7402(2)(a) CS D Delivery or manufacture of certain counterfeit controlled substances 10 333.7402(2)(b) CS E Delivery or manufacture of schedule 1, 2, or 3 counterfeit controlled substance 5 333.7402(2)(c) CS F Delivery or manufacture of counterfeit schedule 4 controlled substance 4 333.7402(2)(d) CS G Delivery or manufacture of counterfeit schedule 5 controlled substance 2 333.7402(2)(e) CS C Delivery or manufacture of controlled substance analogue 15 333.7403(2)(a)(i) CS A Possession of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 333.7403(2)(a)(ii) CS A Possession of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30 333.7403(2)(a)(iii) CS B Possession of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7403(2)(a)(iv) CS G Possession of 25 or more but less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 4 333.7403(2)(a)(v) CS G Possession of less than 25 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 4 333.7403(2)(b)(i) CS D Possession of methamphetamine or 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.7403(2)(b)(ii) CS G Possession of certain schedule 1, 2, 3, or 4 controlled substances or controlled substances analogue 2 333.7403a CS F Fraudulently obtaining controlled substance or prescription for controlled substance 4 333.7405(1)(a) CS G Controlled substance violations by licensee 2 333.7405(1)(b) CS G Manufacturing or distribution violations by licensee 2 333.7405(1)(c) CS G Refusing lawful inspection 2 333.7405(1)(d) CS G Maintaining drug house 2 333.7405(1)(e) CS G Unlawfully dispensing out-of-state prescription 2 333.7407(1)(a) CS G Controlled substance violations by licensee 4 333.7407(1)(b) CS G Use of fictitious, revoked, or suspended license number 4 333.7407(1)(c) CS G Obtaining controlled substance by fraud 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7407(1)(d) CS G False reports under controlled substance article 4 333.7407(1)(e) CS G Possession of counterfeiting implements 4 333.7407(1)(f) CS F Disclosing or obtaining prescription information Possession of a counterfeit prescription form 4 333.7407(1)(g) CS F Possession of counterfeit prescription form 4 333.7407(2) CS G Refusing to furnish records under controlled substance article 4 333.7410a CS G Controlled substance offense or offense involving GBL in or near a park 2 333.7417 CS F Sell or offer to sell named product producing same or similar effect as scheduled ingredient 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. 1 2 3 Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 460 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.